Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 11. Adventure-Based Education.

Collateral references. —

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 778 et seq.

Sec. 14.30.500.
Adventure-based education program.

An adventure-based education program is a program designed to bring adventure-based education to high school students and appropriate juvenile offenders.
A program shall include provisions for the following phases:

Phase I: Basic Skills Learning

physical conditioning: running, hiking, swimming, and other related activities;

technical training: the use of specialized tools and equipment, camping, cooking, map reading, navigation, life saving, drown proofing, and solo survival;

safety training: first aid skills, emergency care, preventive medicine, nutrition, health, and personal hygiene care;

team training: rescue techniques, evacuation exercises, and fire fighting;

solo: solitary living for a short period with minimal equipment;

interpersonal skills training: coping skills, individual and group problem solving, and societal communication skills;

culturally relevant activities: traditional modes of subsistence living, traveling and surviving in wilderness areas and communities in Alaska, and cross-cultural experiences.

Phase II: Skills Generalization

vocational counseling and placement;

family and interpersonal counseling;

community systems utilization:

transportation,

community services systems,

community problem solving.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1979)

Cross references. —

For responsibility of Department of Health and Social Services to establish an adventure-based education program, see AS 47.21.

Sec. 14.30.510.
Alaska student leadership development fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]